src/twol-smj.txt
"ie:æ Diphthong Simplification Part I"
 i:0 <=> [ [ # | #: ] | Cns: | (%>:) (»:) Dummy: ] _ e: Cns:* e: (%>:) (»:) X4: ;     !1
     	 [ [ # | #: ] | Cns: | (%>:) (»:) Dummy: ] _ e: Cns:* e: (%>:) (»:) [ Q2: | Y2: | Y3: ] ;     !2 Prs Sg of e-stem verbs
     	 [ [ # | #: ] | Cns: | (%>:) (»:) Dummy: ] _ e: Cns:* e: Cns: (%>:) (»:) X5: Vow ; !3 odd-syll, oblique
                                _ e: (Cns) Cns:+ e:á (Cns:+) (%>:) (»:) [X5:|Y2:|Q2:|Y3:|X7:|Y4:|X4:(X5:|Q1:)|Y6: X4:|Y7:|[Q1:|Q4:] X4: (X4:) X8:]  ; ! Vovel change in front of stem vowel variation
                                _ e: (Cns) Cns:+ i:á (%>:) (»:) Y5: Cns:+ ;     !Der/r
                                _ e: [[:d|:b|:g] [d|b|g] Cns:+ | Cns:+ | h :Cns Cns:+] e:0 (%>:) (»:) [ Y1: | Y9: ] u ; !ielvvet:ælvvu, ielvvet:ælvvup short passive, ImprtII
                                _ e: Cns:+ e:0 (%>:) (»:) Y8: o ; !ielvvet:ælvvop, Imprt
                                _ e: Cns:+ e:0 (%>:) (»:) Q8: u ; !giesset:gessus, ImprtII


!€ ielvveY9ut
!€ 0ælvv00ut

!€ iehttseY1up
!€ 0æhtts00up

!€ giesseQ8us
!€ g0ess00us


! Note !!! These three rules are supposed to operate in tandem, and shound ALWAYS be kept in synch, except for the operator and operand.
"ie:æ Diphthong Simplification Part IIa" ! Norwegian æ is an option...
 e:æ  =>  [ [ # | #: ] | Cns: | (%>:) (»:) Dummy: ] i: _ Cns:* e: (%>:) (»:) X4: ;  !1
          [ [ # | #: ] | Cns: | (%>:) (»:) Dummy: ] i: _ Cns:* e: (%>:) (»:) [ Q2: | Y2: | Y3: ] ;  !2 Prs Sg of e-stem verbs
          [ [ # | #: ] | Cns: | (%>:) (»:) Dummy: ] i: _ Cns:* e: Cns: (%>:) (»:) X5: Vow ;  !3 odd-syll, oblique
                                 i: _ (Cns) Cns:+ e:á (Cns:+) (%>:) (»:) [X5:|Y2:|Q2:|Y3:|X7:|Y4:|X4:(X5:|Q1:)|Y6: X4:|Y7:|[Q1:|Q4:] X4: (X4:) X8:]  ; ! Vovel change in front of stem vowel variation
                                 i: _ (Cns) Cns:+ i:á (%>:) (»:) Y5: Cns:+  ;                                     !Der/r
                                 i: _ [[:d|:b|:g] [d|b|g] Cns:+ | Cns:+ | h :Cns Cns:+] e:0 (%>:) (»:) [ Y1: | Y9: ] u ; !ielvvet:ælvvu, short passive, ImprtII
                                 i: _ Cns:+ e:0 (%>:) (»:) Y8: o ;                                     !ielvvet:ælvvop, Imprt
          [ [ # | #: ] | Cns: | (%>:) (»:) Dummy: ]    _ Cns Cns:+ a:á (%>:) (»:) ;                                     ! Verbs: e:æ only Vowel change in front of stem vowel variation, bessat : bæssá
!         [ #: | Cns: | (%>:) (»:) Dummy: ]    _ Cns:* a: (%>:) (»:) Y6: ( X5: ) ;                                     ! Verbs: e:æ only Actor nouns
          [ [ # | #: ] | Cns: | (%>:) (»:) Dummy: ]    _ ( [:d|:b|:g] [d|b|g] Cns:+ | Cns:+ | h :Cns Cns:+) a: (%>:) (»:) Y6: ( X5: ) ([Hyph|(Hyph) [ # | #: ]]) ; !bessat:bæsse, imprt, du2 and Actor

"ie:ä Diphthong Simplification Part IIb" ! Swedish ä is an option...
 e:ä  =>  [ [ # | #: ] | Cns: | (%>:) (»:) Dummy: ] i: _ Cns:* e: (%>:) (»:) X4: ;  !1
          [ [ # | #: ] | Cns: | (%>:) (»:) Dummy: ] i: _ Cns:* e: (%>:) (»:) [ Q2: | Y2: | Y3: ] ;  !2 Prs Sg of e-stem verbs
          [ [ # | #: ] | Cns: | (%>:) (»:) Dummy: ] i: _ Cns:* e: Cns: (%>:) (»:) X5: Vow ;  !3 odd-syll, oblique
                                 i: _ (Cns) Cns:+ e:á (Cns:+) (%>:) (»:) [X5:|Y2:|Q2:|Y3:|X7:|Y4:|X4:(X5:|Q1:)|Y6: X4:|Y7:|[Q1:|Q4:] X4: (X4:) X8:] ; ! Vovel change in front of stem vowel variation
                                 i: _ (Cns) Cns:+ i:á (%>:) (»:) Y5: Cns:+ ;                                     !Der/r
                                 i: _ [[:d|:b|:g] [d|b|g] Cns:+ | Cns:+ | h :Cns Cns:+] e:0 (%>:) (»:) [ Y1: | Y9: ] u ;     !ielvvet:ælvvu, short passive, ImprtII
                                 i: _ Cns:+ e:0 (%>:) (»:) Y8: o ;                                     !ielvvet:ælvvop, Imprt
          [ [ # | #: ] | Cns: | (%>:) (»:) Dummy: ]    _ Cns Cns:+ a:á (%>:) (»:) ;                                     ! Verbs: e:æ only Vowel change in front of stem vowel variation, bessat : bæssá
!         [ #: | Cns: | (%>:) (»:) Dummy: ]    _ Cns:* a: (%>:) (»:) Y6: ( X5: ) ;                                     ! Verbs: e:æ only Actor nouns
          [ [ # | #: ] | Cns: | (%>:) (»:) Dummy: ]    _ ( [:d|:b|:g] [d|b|g] Cns:+ | Cns:+ | h :Cns Cns:+) a: (%>:) (»:) Y6: ( X5: ) ([Hyph|(Hyph) [ # | #: ]]) ; !bessat:bæsse, imprt, du2 and Actor

"ie:ä Diphthong Simplification Part IIc" ! And there are no other options. This rule to block the e, and allow for the æ and ä.
 e:e  /<= [ [ # | #: ] | Cns: | (%>:) (»:) Dummy: ] i: _ Cns:* e: (%>:) (»:) X4: ;  !1
          [ [ # | #: ] | Cns: | (%>:) (»:) Dummy: ] i: _ Cns:* e: (%>:) (»:) [ Q2: | Y2: | Y3: ] ;  !2 Prs Sg of e-stem verbs
          [ [ # | #: ] | Cns: | (%>:) (»:) Dummy: ] i: _ Cns:* e: Cns: (%>:) (»:) X5: Vow ;  !3 odd-syll, oblique
                                 i: _ (Cns) Cns:+ e:á (Cns:+) (%>:) (»:) [X5:|Y2:|Q2:|Y3:|X7:|Y4:|X4:(X5:|Q1:)|Y6: X4:|Y7:|[Q1:|Q4:] X4: (X4:) X8:] ; ! Vovel change in front of stem vowel variation
                                 i: _ (Cns) Cns:+ i:á (%>:) (»:) Y5: Cns:+ ;                                     !Der/r
                                 i: _ [[:d|:b|:g] [d|b|g] Cns:+ | Cns:+ | h :Cns Cns:+] e:0 (%>:) (»:) [ Y1: | Y9: ] u ;     !ielvvet:ælvvu, short passive, ImprtII
                                 i: _ Cns:+ e:0 (%>:) (»:) Y8: o ;                                     !ielvvet:ælvvop, Imprt
          [ [ # | #: ] | Cns: | (%>:) (»:) Dummy: ]    _ Cns Cns:+ a:á (%>:) (»:) ;                                     ! Verbs: e:æ only Vowel change in front of stem vowel variation, bessat : bæssá
!         [ #: | Cns: | (%>:) (»:) Dummy: ]    _ Cns:* a: (%>:) (»:) Y6: ( X5: ) ;                                     ! Verbs: e:æ only Actor nouns
          [ [ # | #: ] | Cns: | (%>:) (»:) Dummy: ]    _ ( [:d|:b|:g] [d|b|g] Cns:+ | Cns:+ | h :Cns Cns:+) a: (%>:) (»:) Y6: ( X5: ) ([Hyph|(Hyph) [ # | #: ]]) ; !bessat:bæsse, imprt, du2 and Actor


! Note: Check that Q2 above does not overgenerate to nouns!

!€ jeh0tsaY6
!€ jæhttse0

!€ jeh0tsaY6
!€ jähttse0


!"Diphthong simplification whenever weak grade in a-stems I"
! Vx:0 <=> _ Vy:Vz Cns:* a ( Cns:0 ) (%>:) (»:) WeG: ;
!      where Vx in ( o i )
!	    Vy in ( a e )
!	    Vz in ( å æ )
!	    matched ;

!"Diphtong simplification whenever weak grade in a-stems II"
! Vy:Vz <=> Vx:0 _ Cns:* a ( Cns:0 ) (%>:) (»:) WeG: ;
!      where Vx in ( o i )
!            Vy in ( a e )
!            Vz in ( å æ )
!	    matched ;
!€ boarkkaQ1
!€ b0år0ka0
!€ loavddag8X3#
!€ l0åv0da000



!"Vovel change in front of stem vowel variation"
! æ:e <=> _ Cns Cns:+ o:u (%>:) (»:) ; ! ditto

"Vowel-change oa:å for verbs part I"
 å:o <=> [ [ # | #: ] | Cns: | (%>:) (»:) Dummy: ] _ 0: [Cns:+|:d d] a:á (%>:) (»:) ; ! hållat:hoallá, presSg3
         [ [ # | #: ] | Cns: | (%^:) | (%>:) (»:) Dummy: ] _ 0: ( [:d|:b|:g] [d|b|g]  Cns:+ | Cns:+ | h :Cns Cns:+ | :d d ) a: (%>:) (»:) [ Y6: | Y7: | Y9: ] ( X5: ) ([Hyph|(Hyph) [ # | #: ]]) ; ! hållat:hoalle, imprtDu2

"Vowel-change oa:å for verbs part II"
 0:a <=> [ [ # | #: ] | Cns: | (%>:) (»:) Dummy: ] å: _ [Cns:+|:d d] a:á (%>:) (»:) ;
         [ [ # | #: ] | Cns: | (%^:) | (%>:) (»:) Dummy: ] å: _ ( [:d|:b|:g] [d|b|g] Cns:+ | Cns:+ | h :Cns Cns:+ | :d d ) a: (%>:) (»:) [ Y6: | Y7: | Y9: ] ( X5: ) ([Hyph|(Hyph) [ # | #: ]]) ;

!€ hå0llaY2
!€ hoallá0

!€ gå00dnaY6
!€ goaddne0

!$ hå0llaY2
!$ hållá0

!??? jf jehtsat. TO: jehtsat:jæhttse
!€ gå0h0tsaY6
!€ goahttse0


! Stem vowel alternations
! -----------------------

! a-stem alternations
! - - - - - - - - - -


"a:e in Present Participle of even-syllable verbs"
! a:e <=> Cns: _ (%>:) (»:) Y6: ;
 a:e <=> Cns: _ (%>:) (»:) Y6:0 [Hyph|(Hyph) [ # | #: ]|n:|s:|v:|m:|t:|d:] ;
! bassat : bas'se

!Error message, delete this after testing.
! **** Conflicting pair(s) of contexts:
!  Cns:* _ (%>:) (»:) Y6:0 X4:0 j ;
!  Cns: _ (%>:) (»:) Y6: ;
!Left context example:     b
!Right context example:    Y6:0 X4:0 j


"a:i in Prs Prc of even-syllable verbs"
 a:i <=> Cns: _ (%>:) (»:) Y6:0 ( X5:0 ) j ([Hyph|(Hyph) [ # | #: ]]) ;
!€ bas'saY6jt#
!€ bas0si0jt0

"a-stem vowel deletion"
 a:0 <=> Cns: _ (%>:) (»:) [ Y8: | Y9: ] ; !in even-syllable verbs, imp 1du, 1pl and short passives
 KEEPIF(SHORTCOMP)
         Cns: _ (%>:) (»:) X9: ; !in first-part compounds



! á-stem alternations
! - - - - - - - - - -

"á-stem vowel deletion"
 á:0 <=>  Cns: _ (%>:) (»:) X9: ; !in first-part compounds
ENDKEEP

! e-stem alternations
! - - - - - - - - - -


! e:i
! - -

"e:i in e-stems"
 e:i <=> Cns: _ (%>:) (»:) [ Q1:0 | Q4:0 ] ( X5:0 ) j ; ! 1) WeG or not, e:i, X5 is added to get e:i also in ComSg.
         Cns: _ (%>:) (»:) [ Y6:0 | Q7:0 ] (X5:0) j ([Hyph|(Hyph) [ # | #: ]]) ; ! 2) Actor nouns
         Cns: _ (%>:) (»:) Q1:0 t: j [ [ # | #: ] | [Vow:[v|n|h|b|p|[ # | #: ]]]] ; ! 3) "e:i in potentialis"


! 1) biesse -> biesij
!€ biesseQ1j
!€ bie0si0j

! 2) boahtte -> boahttij
!€ boah0teY6j
!€ boahtti0j

! 3)
!€ gálleQ1tj#
!€ gá0li0sj0

!€ gálleQ1tjav#
!€ gá0li0tjav0

!€ gálleQ1tjin#
!€ gá0li0tjin0

!€ gálleQ1tjihpit#
!€ gá0li0tjihpit0

!€ gálleQ1tjibá#
!€ gá0li0tjibá0

!€ gálleQ1tjip#
!€ gá0li0tjip0

!€ gálleQ1tja#
!€ gá0li0tja0


! e:á
! - -

! The following two rules constitute a <= / => rule pair.

"e:á in certain stem types 1"
 e:á <=  [ Vow: - å ] ([ 0:Cns Cns: | Cns: 0:Cns ]) (Cns:+) _ (%>:) (»:) (Y6:0) X4:0 (X4:0) (X8:0) [m|t|d|s i [m|t|s|m m e|h t t e|s k a|s á]] ; ! 1) Compulsory e:á in Px! bárnne : bárnnám
[ Vow: - å ] Cns:+ _ (%>:) (»:) X4: (X5: | Q1: )  [ [ # | #: ] | v | n | s | j | t | d | g | b | p ] ; ! 2) Ill Sg (context (1) only in part 2)
         [ Vow: - å ] ([ 0:Cns Cns: | Cns: 0:Cns ]) (Cns:+) _ (%>:) (»:) Y6:0 X4:0 j ; ! 3) Ill Sg Actor nouns
         [ Vow: - å ] Cns:+ _ Cns:+ (%>:) (»:) X5: Vow ;     ! 4) Uneven N.
         [ Vow: - å ] Cns:+ _ (%>:) (»:) Y2: ;        ! 5) Indicative Present Singular 3rd Final Vowel in verbs
         [ Vow: - å ] Cns:+ _ (%>:) (»:) Y3: ;              ! 6) PrfPrc, gállet : gállám
         [ Vow: - å ] Cns:+ _ (%>:) (»:) Q2: ;              ! 7) gállet : gáláv
         [ Vow: - å ] Cns:+ _ (%>:) (»:) X7: ;              ! 8) báhko : bágusj, goahte : goadásj
         [ Vow: - å ] ([ 0:Cns Cns: | Cns: 0:Cns ]) (Cns:+) _ (%>:) (»:) Y7: ;              ! 9) PrsPrc dim
	     [ Vow: - å ] Cns:+ _ (%>:) (»:) (Y6:0) [ Q1:0 | Q4:0 ] X4:0 X8:0 ;        ! 10) 1st, 2nd Gen/Acc Px declension
         [ Vow: - å ] Cns:+  _ Cns:* (%>:) (»:) Y4: Vow ;    ! 11)verb der. alla
!         [Cns:|#:] [ a|i|u ] [ Cns:0 Cns: | Cns: Cns:0 ] _ (%>:) (»:) Y5: Cns:+ ; !12) verb Der/(u/a/å)d
         d: i: e: h: t: t: _ (%>:) (»:) Q7: X4: ;
! 2)
!€ bálggeX4v
!€ bálggá0v

! 6)
!€ gálleY3m#
!€ gállá0m0

! 7)
!€ gálleQ2v#
!€ gá0lá0v0

! 8)
!€ báhkoX7tj#
!€ bá0gu0sj0

!€ goahteX7tj#
!€ goa0dá0sj0

!$ goahteX7tj#
!$ go00dá0sj0


! e:á <=> [ Vow: - å ] Cns* _ (%>:) (»:) X4:0 [ j #: | s Vow: ] ;
